California, session 20252026, AB2471.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 8589.71 of the Government Code is amended to read:8589.71. (a) (1) There is in the Office of Emergency Services the Alfred E. Alquist Seismic Safety Commission that consists of 15 17 members, 10 9 of whom shall be appointed by the Governor, subject to confirmation by the Senate, and includes representatives from the professional fields identified in subdivision (d).(2) Any reference in statute or regulation to the Seismic Safety Commission shall be deemed to refer to the Alfred E. Alquist Seismic Safety Commission.(b) The Senate Committee on Rules and the Speaker of the Assembly shall each appoint one member. Each of the members appointed pursuant to this subdivision may designate an alternate who shall be counted toward a quorum, who may vote, and who may receive expenses specified in Section 8589.73.(c) One member shall be a representative from the Office of Emergency Services, one member shall be a representative from the Division of the State Architect in the Department of General Services, one member shall be a representative of the State Fire Marshal, one member shall be a representative of the Department of Insurance, one member shall be a representative of the Strategic Growth Council, and one member shall be a representative from the California Building Standards Commission. These members shall annually update the commission on their seismic safety activities pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 8589.75.(d) (1) Ten Nine members shall represent the fields of structural engineering, planning, fire protection, public or investor owned utilities, insurance, social services, emergency services, and other local government areas that serve the public interest.(2) At least four members shall be submitted by the League of California Cities and the California State Association of Counties.(3) At least one of these members shall be a building official and one of these shall be from a local fire protection entity.(A) These members may be submitted pursuant to paragraph (2) or from professional fields in paragraph (1).(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, while the current membership of the commission is reduced to 15, the following shall occur:(1) Appointments made prior to July 1, 2020, that are from established organizations outside the fields identified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) shall remain on the commission until the current term expires.(f) The Legislature declares that the individuals appointed to the commission are intended to represent the professions of structural engineering, planning, fire protection, public utilities, local government, insurance, social services, emergency services, and the Legislature and that this representation serves the public interest. Accordingly, the Legislature finds that for purposes of persons who hold this office, the specified professions are tantamount to and constitute the public generally within the meaning of Section 87103.(g) Each member of the commission shall be appointed for a term of four years. Vacancies occurring on the commission shall be filled by appointment of the appointing power for the unexpired term.(h) The appointing power may remove any member of the commission for neglect of duty required by this article, incompetency, or unprofessional conduct.SEC. 2. Section 8589.72 of the Government Code is amended to read:8589.72. (a) The commission shall elect annually from its membership its own chairperson and vice chairperson and may replace them with other commissioners by majority vote. Commission members shall be residents of California.(b) The commission shall hold at least three regular meetings each year. Additional meetings may be held upon call of the chairperson or at the written request of any two members of the commission.(c) Notice of each regular meeting of the commission shall be given in accordance with the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3).(d) At least eight nine members shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business at any commission meeting if there are no vacancies, or else a majority of the appointed members of the commission at the time.SEC. 3. Section 8589.75 of the Government Code, as amended by Section 1 of Chapter 212 of the Statutes of 2024, is amended to read:8589.75. (a) The commission exists as a separate unit within the Office of Emergency Services, and may recommend policies, hold meetings, hold hearings, set dates of the meetings or hearings, and positions on proposed state and federal legislation. The commission shall retain authority to issue reports, publications, and literature.(b) (1) At a minimum, the commission shall report annually to the Governor and the Legislature on its findings, progress, and recommendations related to activities of the commission and the state toward higher levels of seismic safety and any other seismic safety issues.(2) The Legislature finds that numerous agencies at various levels of government have substantial responsibilities in the fields of earthquake preparedness and seismic safety. To provide a consistent policy framework to track and monitor those activities, the commission shall, at a minimum, work with agencies that include, but are not limited to, the entities listed in subparagraphs (A) to (I), (L), inclusive, to identify key activities and responsibilities related to seismic safety and develop a schedule to provide periodic updates to the commission on their activities. This information shall be summarized in the report required in paragraph (1) and include information to find additional information related to these activities therein:(A) Department of Conservation, California Geological Survey.(B) California Earthquake Authority.(C) Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development.(D) Department of Transportation.(E) Department of Water Resources, Division of Safety of Dams.(F) Public Utilities Commission.(G) State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission.(H) University of California.(I) The California State University.(J) Office of the State Fire Marshal.(K) Department of Insurance.(L) Strategic Growth Council.(c) (1) The commission may coordinate with the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection and the Office of Emergency Services to do any of the following:(A) Develop a list of all fire stations in California and each station’s status in meeting the standards of the Essential Services Buildings Seismic Safety Act of 1986 (Article 1 (commencing with Section 16000) of Chapter 2 of Division 12.5 of the Health and Safety Code) to determine which stations are adequately designed and constructed to minimize fire hazards and to resist the forces generated by earthquakes, gravity, and winds.(B) Collect data on the implementation of earthquake early warning technology in all fire stations in California and their interest in implementing that technology.(C) Research other potential sources of funding for seismic mitigation activities.(D) Make policy recommendations to the Legislature to mitigate the risks of both of the following:(i) Fires following major earthquakes in urban areas including, but not limited to, alternative water suppression systems.(ii) Disruptions to fuel, gas, electrical, water, transportation, communications, and other lifeline infrastructure systems due to major earthquakes.(2) By January 1, 2026, and annually thereafter, the commission shall provide a report to the Assembly Committee and Senate Committees on Emergency Management and the Senate Committee on Governmental Organization describing the commission’s actions and conclusions actions, conclusions, and policy recommendations pursuant to paragraph (1).(d) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 4. Section 8589.75 of the Government Code, as added by Section 2 of Chapter 212 of the Statutes of 2024, is amended to read:8589.75. (a) The commission exists as a separate unit within the Office of Emergency Services, and may recommend policies, hold meetings, hold hearings, set dates of the meetings or hearings, and positions on proposed state and federal legislation. The commission shall retain authority to issue reports, publications, and literature.(b) (1) At a minimum, the commission shall report annually to the Governor and the Legislature on its findings, progress, and recommendations related to activities of the commission and the state toward higher levels of seismic safety and any other seismic safety issues.(2) The Legislature finds that numerous agencies at various levels of government have substantial responsibilities in the fields of earthquake preparedness and seismic safety. To provide a consistent policy framework to track and monitor those activities, the commission shall, at a minimum, work with agencies that include, but are not limited to, the entities listed in subparagraphs (A) to (I), (L), inclusive, to identify key activities and responsibilities related to seismic safety and develop a schedule to provide periodic updates to the commission on their activities. This information shall be summarized in the report required in paragraph (1) and include information to find additional information related to these activities therein:(A) Department of Conservation, California Geological Survey.(B) California Earthquake Authority.(C) Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development.(D) Department of Transportation.(E) Department of Water Resources, Division of Safety of Dams.(F) Public Utilities Commission.(G) State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission.(H) University of California.(I) The California State University.(J) Office of the State Fire Marshal.(K) Department of Insurance.(L) Strategic Growth Council.(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2030.